District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0785.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Peer-to-Peer Car Sharing Rental Vehicle Sales Tax Clarification
Emergency Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Title 47 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as follows:
(a) Section 47-2002(a)(4B) is amended to read as follows:
“(4B) The rate of tax on the gross receipts from the sale of or charges for the
rental or leasing of rental vehicles and utility trailers as defined in § 50-1505.01 shall be:
“(A) 9.25% beginning October 1, 2018, through September 30, 2026; and
“(B) 11% beginning on October 1, 2026, and continuing thereafter.”.
(b) Section 47-2202(a)(3B) is amended to read as follows:
“(3B) The rate of tax on the gross receipts from the sale of or charges for the
rental or leasing of rental vehicles and utility trailers as defined in § 50-1505.01 shall be:
“(A) 9.25% beginning October 1, 2018, through September 30, 2026; and
“(B) 11% beginning on October 1, 2026, and continuing thereafter.”.
Sec. 3. Section 7012 of the Hotel and Rental Car Taxes Amendment Act of 2026, enacted
on August 14, 2026 (D.C. Act 26-418; 73 DCR 11735), is amended as follows:
(a) Amendatory section 47-2002(a)(4B) in subsection (a)(1)(B) is amended to read as
follows:
“(4B) The rate of tax on the gross receipts from the sale of or charges for the
rental or leasing of rental vehicles and utility trailers as defined in § 50-1505.01 shall be:
“(A) 9.25% beginning October 1, 2018, through September 30, 2026; and
“(B) 11% beginning on October 1, 2026, and continuing thereafter.”.
(b) Amendatory section 47-2202(a)(3B) in subsection (b) is amended to read as follows:
“(3B) The rate of tax on the gross receipts from the sale of or charges for the
rental or leasing of rental vehicles and utility trailers as defined in § 50-1505.01 shall be:
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(A) 9.25% beginning October 1, 2018, through September 30, 2026; and
“(B) 11% beginning on October 1, 2026, and continuing thereafter.”.
Sec. 4. Applicability.
This act shall apply as of October 1, 2026.
Sec. 5. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 6. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), and shall remain in effect for no longer than
90 days, as provided for emergency acts of the Council of the District of Columbia in section
412(a) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813;
D.C. Official Code § 1-204.12(a)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2